Utah statutes.
63K-2-201.   Information-gathering powers -- Subpoena power -- Coordination with other regulatory authorities.

(1)  On a continuing basis the governor may obtain all necessary information from energy resource producers, manufacturers, suppliers, and consumers doing business within, and from political subdivisions in, this state as necessary to determine whether shortages or an emergency will require energy resource conservation measures.  This information may include, but shall not be limited to:

(a)  sales volumes;

(b)  forecasts of energy resource requirements;

(c)  from manufacturers, suppliers, and consumers, an inventory of energy resources; and

(d)  local distribution patterns of the information described in Subsections (1)(a), (1)(b), and (1)(c).

(2)  In obtaining information at any time from energy resource producers, manufacturers, suppliers, or consumers under Subsection (1)(c) and in obtaining any other information under Subsection (1) during a state of emergency proclaimed, the governor may subpoena witnesses, material and relevant books, papers, accounts, records, and memoranda, administer oaths, and cause the depositions of persons residing within or without the state to be taken in the manner prescribed for depositions in civil actions in district courts, to obtain information relevant to energy resources that are the subject of the proclaimed emergency.

(3)  In obtaining information under this section the governor shall:

(a)  seek to avoid eliciting information already furnished by a person or political subdivision in this state to a federal, state, or local regulatory authority that is available for the governor's study; and

(b)  cause reporting procedures, including forms, to conform to existing requirements of federal, state, and local regulatory authorities wherever possible.

